Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
SPECIAL FACILITY REVENUE BONDS

Revision Note

Enacted as part II, this part is renumbered as part III
pursuant to §23G-15.

[§206M-41] Definitions. As used in
this part, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

"Special facility" means one or more
buildings, structures, or facilities and the land thereof located in an
industrial park for the high technology industry, including, without
limitation, facilities for technology research, development, support,
processing, and manufacturing, which are the subject of a special facility
lease.

"Special facility lease" includes a
contract, lease, or other agreement, or any combination thereof, the subject
matter of which is the same special facility.

"Special facility revenue bonds"
means all bonds, notes, and other instruments of indebtedness of the State
issued pursuant to this part and part III of chapter 39. [L 2000, c 72, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next